District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.23

Appeal and review.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision of a board may appeal the decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals pursuant to § 2-510.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.23.